Alaska statutes. Title 21. Insurance.
Chapter 79. Alaska Life and Health Insurance Guaranty Association Act.
Sec. 21.79.060.
Powers and duties of the association.

If a member insurer becomes impaired, the association may, with the approval of the director and subject to any conditions imposed by the association that do not impair the contractual obligations of the impaired insurer,

guarantee, assume, reissue, reinsure, or provide for the guarantee, assumption, reissuance, or reinsurance of the policies or contracts of the impaired insurer; and

provide money, pledges, loans, notes, guarantees, or other means that are necessary to act under (1) of this subsection and to assure payment of the contractual obligations of the impaired insurer until those obligations are guaranteed, reinsured, or assumed.

If a member insurer becomes insolvent, the association shall, in its discretion and with the approval of the director,

guarantee, assume, reissue, reinsure, or provide for the guarantee, assumption, reissuance, or reinsurance of the covered policies or contracts of the insolvent insurer, or otherwise assure payment of the contractual obligations of the insolvent insurer; and provide money, pledges, loans, notes, guarantees, or other means that are necessary to discharge the association’s duties under this section; or

provide benefits and coverage in accordance with the following provisions:

with respect to policies and contracts, assure payment of benefits that would have been payable under a policy or contract of the insolvent insurer for claims incurred with respect to

a group policy or contract, not later than the earlier of the next renewal date under the policy or contract or 45 days, but in no event less than 30 days, after the date on which the association becomes obligated with respect to the policy or contract;

an individual policy, contract, or annuity, not later than the earlier of the next renewal date, if any, under the policy or contract or one year, but in no event less than 30 days, after the date on which the association becomes obligated with respect to the policy or contract;

with respect to an individual or group policy or contract, make a diligent effort to provide a known insured, an enrollee, an annuitant, or a group policy owner or group contract owner 30 days’ notice of the termination of the benefits provided;

with respect to an individual policy or contract, make available to each known insured, enrollee, or annuitant, or owner if other than an insured, enrollee, or annuitant, and with respect to an individual who was formerly an insured, enrollee, or annuitant under a group policy or contract who is not eligible for replacement group coverage, make available substitute coverage on an individual basis under (D) of this paragraph, if the insured, enrollee, or annuitant had a right under law or under the terminated policy or contract to convert coverage to individual coverage or to continue an individual policy or contract in force until a specified age, or for a specific time during which the insurer, hospital or medical service corporation, or health maintenance organization did not have the unilateral right to make changes in any provision of the policy or contract or had a right only to make changes in premium by class;

in providing the substitute coverage under (C) of this paragraph, the association

shall offer either to reissue the terminated coverage or to issue an alternate policy or contract at actuarially justified rates;

shall offer an alternative or reissued policy or contract without requiring evidence of insurability and may not provide for a waiting period or exclusion that would not have applied under the terminated policy or contract; and

may reinsure an alternative or reissued policy or contract;

an alternative policy or contract must

if adopted by the association, be subject to the approval of the director; the association may adopt alternative policies or contracts of various types for future issuance without regard to a particular impairment or insolvency;

contain at least the minimum statutory provisions required in the state and provide benefits that may not be unreasonable in relation to the premium charged; the association shall set the premium under a table of rates that it shall adopt; the premium must reflect the amount of insurance to be provided and the age and class of risk of each insured, but may not reflect changes in the health of the insured after the original policy or contract was last underwritten;

if issued by the association, provide coverage of a type similar to that of the policy or contract issued by the impaired or insolvent insurer, as determined by the association;

if the association elects to reissue terminated coverage at a premium rate different from that charged under the terminated policy or contract, the premium shall be actuarially justified and set by the association according to the amount of insurance or coverage provided and the age and class of risk;

the association’s obligations with respect to coverage under a policy or contract of an impaired or insolvent insurer or under a reissued or alternative policy or contract stop on the date the coverage, policy, or contract is replaced by another similar policy or contract by the policy or contract owner, the insured, the enrollee, or the association;

when proceeding under this subsection with respect to a policy or contract carrying guaranteed minimum interest rates, the association shall assure the payment or crediting of a rate of interest consistent with AS

21.79.020(c)(4)

.

Nonpayment of a premium within 31 days after the date required under the terms of a guaranteed, assumed, alternative or reissued policy or contract or substitute coverage terminates the obligations of the association under the policy, contract, or coverage except with respect to the claims incurred or the net cash surrender value that may be due under the provisions of this chapter.

A premium due for coverage after entry of an order of liquidation of an insolvent insurer belongs to and is payable at the direction of the association. Upon request of a liquidator of an insolvent insurer, the association shall provide a report to the liquidator regarding the premium collected by the association. The association is liable for unearned premiums due to a policy or contract owner arising after the entry of the order.

The protection provided by this chapter does not apply if guaranty protection is provided to residents of this state by the laws of another state or jurisdiction that is the domicile of the impaired or insolvent insurer.

In carrying out its duties under (b) of this section, the association may impose a permanent policy or contract lien under a guarantee, assumption, or reinsurance agreement if the policy or contract lien is approved by a court and the association finds that

the amount that may be assessed under this chapter is less than the amount needed to assure full and prompt performance of the association’s duties under this chapter; or

the economic or financial condition that affects member insurers is sufficiently adverse that the imposition of a policy or contract lien is in the public interest.

In carrying out its duties under (b) of this section, the association may request the superior court to impose an injunction against the payment of a cash value and policy loan, or the exercise of another right to withdraw funds held in connection with a policy or contract, in addition to a contractual provision for deferral of a cash or policy loan value. In addition, if the receivership court imposes an injunction on payment of cash values or policy loans or on any other right to withdraw funds of an impaired or insolvent insurer held in conjunction with a policy or contract, the association may defer payment of cash values, policy loans, or other rights for the period of the injunction, except for claims covered by the association to be paid as required by a hardship procedure established by the liquidator or rehabilitator and approved by the receivership court.

If the association fails to take action under (b) of this section within a reasonable period of time after a member insurer becomes insolvent, the director shall assume the powers of the association under (b) of this section.

If requested by the director, the association may assist and advise the director concerning rehabilitation, payment of claims, continuance of coverage, or the performance of other contractual obligations of an impaired or insolvent insurer.

The association is entitled to appear or intervene in a court or agency proceeding in this state involving an impaired or insolvent insurer that the association is or may be obligated to or involving a person or property against which the association may have rights. The standing conferred by this subsection extends to all matters germane to the powers and duties of the association, including proposals to reinsure or guarantee a covered policy of the impaired or insolvent insurer and the determination of a covered policy and a contractual obligation. The association also has the right to appear or intervene before a court or agency in another state in a proceeding involving an impaired or insolvent insurer that the association is or may be obligated to or involving a person or property against which the association may have rights.

A person who receives benefits under this chapter is considered to have assigned the rights under, and any cause of action against a person for losses arising under, resulting from, or otherwise relating to, the covered policy to the association to the extent of the benefits received under this chapter, whether the benefits are payment of or on account of contractual obligations, continuations of coverage, or provisions of substitute or alternative policies, contracts, or coverages. The association may require an assignment to the association of those rights by the enrollee, payee, policy or contract owner, beneficiary, insured, or annuitant before a person receives the rights or benefits conferred by this chapter. The priority of the association’s subrogation right to the assets of the insolvent insurer is the same as the priority of the person entitled to benefits under this chapter. In addition to the rights described in this subsection, the association has common law rights of subrogation and any other equitable or legal remedy that would have been available to the impaired or insolvent insurer or owner, beneficiary, enrollee, or payee of a policy or contract with respect to the policy or contract. These rights include, in the case of a structured settlement annuity, the rights of the enrollee, owner, beneficiary, or payee of the annuity, to the extent of benefits received under this chapter, against a person originally or by succession responsible for the losses arising from the personal injury relating to the annuity or annuity payment, except for a person responsible solely by reason of being an assignee in respect to a qualified assignment under 26 U.S.C. 130 (Internal Revenue Code). If the provisions of this subsection are invalid with respect to a person or claim, the amount payable by the association with respect to the related coverage obligation shall be reduced by the amount realized by another person from the person or claim covered by the association. If the association has provided benefits with respect to a covered obligation and a person recovers amounts to which the association has rights as described in this subsection, the person recovering the amounts shall pay to the association the portion of the recovery attributable to the policies or contracts covered by the association.

In addition to the rights and powers otherwise established in this chapter, the association may

enter into contracts that are necessary or proper to carry out the provisions of this chapter;

sue or be sued, and take legal action necessary or proper for recovery of an unpaid assessment under AS

21.79.070

or settlement of a claim or potential claim;

borrow money to carry out the purposes of this chapter; notes or other evidence of indebtedness of the association not in default are legal investments for domestic member insurers and may be carried as admitted assets;

employ or retain those persons necessary to handle the financial transactions of the association and other functions under this chapter;

negotiate and contract with a liquidator, rehabilitator, conservator, or ancillary receiver to carry out the powers and duties of the association;

exercise, for the purposes of this chapter and to the extent approved by the director, the powers of a domestic life insurer, health insurer, hospital or medical service corporation, or health maintenance organization; however, the association may not issue policies or contracts other than those issued to perform its obligations under this chapter;

take legal action to prevent or recover the payment of improper claims;

join an organization of one or more other state associations with similar purposes;

determine, using reasonable business judgment, the means by which the association is to provide the benefits of this chapter in an economical and efficient manner;

request information from a person seeking coverage from the association in order to determine the obligations of the association under this chapter; a person receiving a request under this paragraph shall promptly comply with the request;

request information from a member insurer in order to aid in the exercise of a power under this section; a member insurer receiving a request under this paragraph shall promptly comply with the request;

unless prohibited by law, in accordance with the terms of the policy or contract, file for actuarially justified rates or premium increases for a policy or contract for which it provides coverage under this chapter; and

perform all other acts necessary or proper to implement this chapter.

When the association has arranged or offered to provide the benefits of this chapter to a covered person under a plan or arrangement that fulfills the association’s obligations under this chapter, the covered person is not entitled to benefits from the association in addition to or other than those provided under the plan or arrangement.

In carrying out its duties in connection with guaranteeing, assuming, or reinsuring a policy or contract, the association may, subject to approval of the receivership court, issue substitute coverage for a policy or contract that provides an interest rate, crediting rate, or similar factor determined by use of an index or other external reference stated in the policy or contract employed in calculating returns or changes in value by issuing an alternative policy or contract under the following provisions:

in place of the index or other external reference provided for in the original policy or contract, the alternative policy or contract provides for

a fixed interest rate;

payment of dividends with minimum guarantees; or

a different method for calculating interest or changes in value;

there is no requirement for evidence of insurability, waiting period, or other exclusion that would not have applied under the replaced policy or contract; and

the alternative policy or contract is substantially similar to the replaced policy or contract in all other material terms.

The rights and obligations of the association, reinsurers of an insolvent insurer, and the receiver of an insolvent insurer are governed by the following provisions:

not later than 180 days after the date of the order of liquidation, the association may elect to succeed to the rights and obligations of the ceding member insurer that relate to policies, contracts, or annuities covered, in whole or in part, by the association, in each case under any one or more reinsurance contracts entered into by the insolvent insurer and its reinsurers and selected by the association; an assumption is effective as of the date of the order of liquidation; the election shall be effected by the association or the National Organization of Life and Health Insurance Guaranty Associations on the association’s behalf by written notice, return receipt requested, to the affected reinsurers; to facilitate the earliest practicable decision about whether to assume any of the contracts of reinsurance and to protect the financial position of the estate, as soon as possible after commencement of formal delinquency proceedings, the receiver and each reinsurer of the ceding member insurer shall make available, upon request, to the association or the National Organization of Life and Health Insurance Guaranty Associations on the association’s behalf

copies of in-force contracts of reinsurance and all related files and records relevant to the determination of whether those contracts should be assumed; and

notices of any defaults under the reinsurance contracts or any known event or condition that, with the passage of time, could become a default under the reinsurance contracts;

as to reinsurance contracts assumed by the association under this subsection,

the association is responsible for all unpaid premiums due under the reinsurance contracts for periods before, on, and after the date of the order of liquidation and is responsible for the performance of all other obligations to be performed on and after the date of the order of liquidation in each case that relates to policies, contracts, or annuities covered, in whole or in part, by the association; the association may charge policies, contracts, or annuities covered in part by the association, through reasonable allocation methods, the costs for reinsurance in excess of the obligations of the association and shall provide notice and an accounting of those charges to the liquidator;

the association is entitled to any amounts payable by the reinsurer under the reinsurance contracts with respect to losses or events that occur in periods on and after the date of the order of liquidation and that relate to policies, contracts, or annuities covered, in whole or in part, by the association, if, upon receiving those amounts, the association is obliged to pay to the beneficiary, under the policy, contract, or annuity for which the amounts were paid, a portion of the amount equal to the lesser of the amount

received by the association; and

by which the amount received by the association exceeds the amount equal to the benefits paid by the association under the policy, contract, or annuity, less the amount retained by the insurer applicable to the loss or event;

not later than 30 days after the association’s election, the association and each reinsurer under contracts assumed by the association shall calculate the net balance due to or from the association under each reinsurance contract as of the election date with respect to policies, contracts, or annuities covered, in whole or in part, by the association; in making the calculation, the association and reinsurer shall give full credit to all items paid by either the member insurer or its receiver or the reinsurer before the election date; the reinsurer shall pay the receiver any amounts due for losses or events before the date of the order of liquidation, subject to any set-off for premiums unpaid for periods before the date, and the association or reinsurer shall pay any remaining balance due the other, in each case, not later than five days after the completion of the calculation; a dispute over the amount due to the association or reinsurer shall be resolved by arbitration under the terms of the affected reinsurance contract or, if the contract does not contain an arbitration clause, as otherwise provided by law; if the receiver has received an amount due to the association under (B) of this paragraph, the receiver shall remit the amount to the association as promptly as practicable;

if the association or receiver on the association’s behalf, not later than 60 days after the election date, pays the unpaid premiums due for periods both before and after the election date that relate to policies, contracts, or annuities covered, in whole or in part, by the association, the reinsurer may not terminate the reinsurance contracts for failure to pay premium insofar as the reinsurance contracts relate to policies, contracts, or annuities covered, in whole or in part, by the association, and may not set off an unpaid amount due under another contract or an unpaid amount due from a party other than the association against amounts due to the association;

during the period from the date of the order of liquidation until the election date, or, if the election date does not occur, until 180 days after the date of the order of liquidation,

neither the association nor the reinsurer shall have any rights or obligations under reinsurance contracts that the association has the right to assume, whether for periods before, on, or after the date of the order of liquidation; and

the reinsurer, the receiver, and the association shall, to the extent practicable, provide to each other data and records reasonably requested, if, once the association has elected to assume a reinsurance contract, the parties’ rights and obligations are governed by this subsection;

if the association does not elect to assume a reinsurance contract by the election date, the association does not have rights or obligations, in each case for periods before, on, and after the date of the order of liquidation, with respect to the reinsurance contract;

when policies, contracts, annuities, or covered obligations with respect to policies or annuities are transferred to an assuming insurer, the association may also transfer reinsurance on the policies, contracts, or annuities, in the case of contracts assumed by the association, subject to the following:

unless the reinsurer and the assuming insurer agree otherwise, the reinsurance contract transferred may not cover any new policies or insurance, contracts, or annuities in addition to those transferred;

the obligations described in (1) of this subsection do not apply with respect to matters arising on and after the effective date of the transfer; and

notice shall be given in writing, return receipt requested, by the transferring party to the affected reinsurer not less than 30 days before the effective date of the transfer;

the provisions of this subsection supersede the provisions of any state law or of any affected reinsurance contract that provides for or requires any payment of reinsurance proceeds, on account of losses or events that occur in periods on and after the date of the order of liquidation, to the receiver of the insolvent insurer or another person; the receiver shall remain entitled to any amounts payable by the reinsurer under the reinsurance contracts with respect to losses or events that occur in periods before the date of the liquidation, subject to applicable set-off provisions;

except as otherwise provided in this section, nothing in this subsection

alters or modifies the terms and conditions of a reinsurance contract;

abrogates or limits the right of a reinsurer to claim that the reinsurer is entitled to rescind a reinsurance contract;

gives a policy or contract owner, enrollee, certificate holder, or beneficiary an independent cause of action against a reinsurer that is not otherwise set out in the reinsurance contract;

limits or affects the association’s rights as a creditor of the estate against the assets of the estate; and

applies to a reinsurance agreement covering property or casualty risks.

History.

(§ 3 ch 52 SLA 1990; am §§ 87 — 92 ch 56 SLA 1996; am §§ 12 — 24, 46 ch 119 SLA 2000; am §§ 13 — 22, 58 ch 47 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

Subsection (o) was enacted as (aa); relettered in 2018, at which time existing subsections (d), (k) — (t), (y) and (z) were relettered as (b) and (c) — (n) and internal cross references in subsections (f), (g), and (h) were conformed to the relettering.

Cross references. —

For effect of (r) [now (j)] of this section on the Rules of Court, see § 14,
ch. 52, SLA 1990 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective July 1, 2018, rewrote the section.

Sec. 21.79.070.
Assessments.

For the purpose of providing funds necessary to carry out the powers and duties of the association, the Board of Governors shall by resolution assess the member insurers, separately for each account, at a time and for an amount that the board finds necessary. Assessments are authorized when a resolution is passed and are due not less than 30 days after prior written notice to the member insurers and accrue interest at 10 percent a year from the date payment is due. Authorized assessments become called when notice is mailed by the association to member insurers.

There shall be two assessments as follows:

class A assessments shall be authorized and called for the purpose of meeting administrative and legal costs and other expenses and examinations conducted under the authority of AS

21.79.060

; class A assessments may be authorized and called whether or not related to a particular impaired or insolvent insurer;

class B assessments shall be authorized and called only as necessary to carry out the powers and duties of the association with regard to an impaired or an insolvent insurer.

The amount of a class A assessment shall be determined by the board and may be made on a pro rata or non pro rata basis. If a pro rata assessment is made, the board may provide that it be credited against future class B assessments. The amount of a class B assessment, except for assessments related to long-term care insurance, shall be allocated for assessment purposes between the accounts and among the subaccounts of the life insurance and annuity account under an allocation formula that may be based on the premiums or reserves of the impaired or insolvent insurer or by another standard determined by the board in its sole discretion as being fair and reasonable under the circumstances. The amount of the class B assessment for long-term care insurance written by the impaired or insolvent insurer shall be allocated according to a methodology included in the association’s plan of operation approved by the director. The methodology must provide for 50 percent of the assessment to be allocated to accident and health member insurers and 50 percent to be allocated to life and annuity member insurers.

Class B assessments shall be based on the premiums received on business in this state by each assessed member insurer on policies or contracts covered by each account in proportion to the premiums received on business in this state by all assessed member insurers during the three calendar years preceding the year in which the insolvency or impairment occurred.

The association may abate or defer, in whole or in part, the assessment of a member insurer if, in the opinion of the board, a payment of the assessment would endanger the ability of the member insurer to fulfill its contractual obligations. The amount by which an assessment against a member insurer is abated or deferred may be assessed against the other member insurers in a manner consistent with the basis for assessments set forth in (c) of this section. Once the conditions that caused a deferral are removed or rectified, the member insurer shall pay all assessments that were deferred under a repayment plan approved by the association.

Except as provided in this subsection, the total of all assessments on a member insurer for each subaccount of the life and annuity account and for the health account may not in any one calendar year exceed two percent of the member insurer’s average annual premiums received in this state on policies or contracts covered by the account or subaccount during the three calendar years preceding the year in which the member insurer became an impaired or insolvent insurer. If two or more assessments are authorized in one calendar year with respect to member insurers that become impaired or insolvent in different calendar years, the average annual premiums for purposes of the aggregate assessment percentage limitation imposed under this subsection shall be limited to the highest of the average annual premiums during the preceding three calendar years for the applicable subaccount or account as calculated under this section. If the maximum assessment, together with the other assets of the association in an account, does not provide in any one year in either account an amount sufficient to carry out the responsibilities of the association, the necessary additional funds shall be assessed as soon as permitted by this chapter.

The board may provide in the plan of operation a method of allocating funds among claims, whether relating to one or more impaired or insolvent insurers, when the maximum assessment will be insufficient to cover anticipated claims.

If the maximum assessment for a subaccount of the life and annuity account in any one year does not provide an amount sufficient to carry out the responsibilities of the association, the board shall, as provided under (d) of this section, access all subaccounts of the life and annuity account for the necessary additional amount, subject to the assessment limit provided in (f) of this section.

Assessments for funds to meet the requirements of the association with respect to an impaired or insolvent insurer may not be authorized or called until necessary to implement the purposes of this chapter. Classification of assessments under (b) of this section and computation of assessments under this section shall be made with a reasonable degree of accuracy, recognizing that exact determinations may not always be possible. The association shall notify each member insurer of its anticipated pro rata share of an authorized assessment not yet called within 180 days after the assessment is authorized.

The board may, by an equitable method as established in the plan of operation, refund to member insurers, in proportion to the contribution of each member insurer to that account, the amount by which the assets of the account exceed the amount the board finds is necessary to carry out during the coming year the obligations of the association with regard to that account, including assets accruing from assignment, subrogation, net realized gains, and income from investments. A reasonable amount may be retained in any account to provide funds for the continuing expenses of the association and for future losses claims.

A member insurer may, in determining its premium rates and policy owner dividends as to any kind of insurance, hospital or medical service corporation business, or health maintenance organization business within the scope of this chapter, consider the amount reasonably necessary to meet its assessment obligations under this chapter.

A member insurer that wishes to protest all or part of an assessment shall pay when due the full amount of the assessment as set out in the notice provided by the association. The payment shall be available to meet association obligations during the pendency of the protest or any subsequent appeal. If a payment is made under protest, payment must be accompanied by a statement in writing that the payment is made under protest and setting out a brief statement of the grounds for the protest. Within 60 days following the payment of an assessment under protest by a member insurer, the association shall notify the member insurer in writing of its determination with respect to the protest unless the association notifies the member insurer that additional time is required to resolve the issues raised by the protest. Within 30 days after a final decision has been made, the association shall notify the protesting member insurer in writing of that final decision. Within 60 days after receipt of notice of the final decision, the protesting member insurer may appeal that final action to the director. In the alternative to rendering a final decision with respect to a protest based on a question regarding the assessment base, the association may refer protests to the director for a final decision with or without recommendation from the association. If a protest or appeal on an assessment is upheld, the amount paid in error or excess shall be returned to the member insurer. Interest on a refund due a protesting member insurer shall be paid at the rate actually earned by the association.

History.

(§ 3 ch 52 SLA 1990; am § 93 ch 56 SLA 1996; am §§ 25 — 31 ch 119 SLA 2000; am §§ 23 — 28 ch 47 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective July 1, 2018, in (a), inserted “by resolution” following “Board of Governors shall” in the first sentence, inserted “authorized when a resolution is passed and are” following “Assessments are” in the second sentence, added the third sentence; in (c), deleted the former third sentence, which read, “A non pro rata assessment may not exceed $250 per member insurer in a calendar year.”, in the present third sentence inserted “, except for assessments related to long-term care insurance,” following “class B assessment” and “and among the subaccounts of the life insurance and annuity account” following “between the accounts”, made a stylistic change, added last two sentences; in (f) and (j), inserted “member” preceding “insurer”, or similar, four times; in (k), inserted “, hospital or medical service corporation business, or health maintenance organization business” following “any kind of insurance”; in (

l

), in the sixth sentence, substituted “Within 60 days after” for “Within 60 days of”, in the eighth sentence, substituted “member insurer” for “member company”, in the ninth sentence, inserted “insurer” following “protesting member”.

Sec. 21.79.080.
Plan of operation.

The association shall submit to the director a plan of operation and any amendments to assure the fair, reasonable, and equitable administration of the association. The plan of operation and any amendments take effect on the written approval of the plan by the director or 30 days after receipt by the director if not disapproved by the director.

If the association fails to submit suitable amendments to the plan, the director shall, after notice and hearing, adopt regulations to implement this chapter. These regulations remain in effect until amended or repealed by the director.

A member insurer shall comply with the plan of operation. The plan of operation must

establish procedures for handling assets of the association;

establish the amount and method of reimbursing members of the board under AS

21.79.050(c)

;

establish regular places and times for meetings of the board in the state; the board may conduct meetings telephonically;

establish procedures for keeping records of all financial transactions of the association, its agents, and the board;

establish terms of office for members of the board, and establish procedures for the selection of the members of the board and for the director’s approval of the members selected;

establish additional procedures for assessments under AS

21.79.070

;

establish procedures for removing a member of the board for cause, including procedures for removing a member of the board who becomes an impaired or insolvent insurer;

establish policy and procedures for addressing conflicts of interest; and

contain additional provisions necessary or proper for the association to exercise its powers and duties.

The plan of operation may delegate the powers and duties of the association, other than those under AS

21.79.060(l)(3)

and

21.79.070

, to a corporation or other organization performing functions similar to those of the association, or its equivalent, in two or more states. The association shall reimburse the corporation or organization for a payment made for the association and for performing a function of the association. A delegation under this subsection takes effect only with the approval of the board and the director.

History.

(§ 3 ch 52 SLA 1990; am §§ 32 — 34 ch 119 SLA 2000; am § 29 ch 47 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

In 2018, in (d) of this section, “AS

21.79.060

(

l

)(3)” was substituted for “AS

21.79.060

(t)(3)” to reflect the 2018 relettering of AS 21.79.060.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective July 1, 2018, added (c)(7) and (8), and made related changes.

Sec. 21.79.090.
Powers and duties of the director.

Upon request of the board, the director shall provide the association with a statement of the premiums in the appropriate states for each member insurer.

The director may

after notice and hearing as provided in AS

21.06.180

—

21.06.230

, suspend or revoke the certificate of authority to transact business in this state of a member insurer that fails to pay an assessment when due or fails to comply with the plan of operation;

levy a penalty on a member insurer that fails to comply with the plan of operation; or

levy a penalty on a member insurer that fails to pay an assessment when due; if the unpaid assessment is more than $2,000, the penalty may not exceed five percent of the unpaid assessment a month or be less than $100 a month; if the unpaid assessment is $2,000 or less, the penalty is $100 a month.

A final action of the board or the association may be appealed to the director by a member insurer if the appeal is taken not later than 60 days after the date the notice of the action is mailed. Final action or order of the director may be reviewed by the superior court.

The liquidator, rehabilitator, or conservator of an impaired or insolvent insurer may notify all interested persons of the effect of this chapter.

History.

(§ 3 ch 52 SLA 1990; am §§ 30 — 32 ch 47 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective July 1, 2018, in (b), substituted “transact business” for “transact insurance” following “authority to” in (b)(1), twice substituted “$100 a month” for “$100 per month” in (b)(3); in (c), substituted “A final action” for “An action” at the beginning, and “not later than 60” for “within 30” following “appeal is taken; in (d), inserted “or insolvent” following “an impaired”.